Washington statutes.
RCW 44.04.390

Code of conduct—Training for registered lobbyists.

The chief clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate shall develop and provide a training course for registered lobbyists regarding the legislative code of conduct and any policies related to appropriate conduct adopted by the senate or the house of representatives.

[ 2019 c 469 s 1.]